Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

40-3.2-101. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that cost-effective natural gas and electricity demand-side management programs will save money for consumers and utilities and protect Colorado's environment. The general assembly further finds, determines, and declares that providing funding mechanisms to encourage Colorado's public utilities to reduce emissions or air pollutants and to increase energy efficiency are matters of statewide concern and that the public interest is served by providing such funding mechanisms. Such efforts will result in an improvement in the quality of life and health of Colorado citizens and an increase in the attractiveness of Colorado as a place to live and conduct business.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article added, p. 1050, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 984, § 2, effective May 22.

40-3.2-102. Recovery of air quality improvement costs.

A public utility shall be entitled to fully recover from its retail customers the air quality improvement costs that it prudently incurs as a result of a voluntary agreement entered into pursuant to part 12 of article 7 of title 25, C.R.S., after July 1, 1998, except as provided in subsection (7) of this section.

For the purposes of this article, "air quality improvement costs" means the incremental life-cycle costs including capital, operating, maintenance, fuel, and financing costs incurred or to be incurred by a public utility at electric generating facilities located in Colorado. To account for the timing differences between various costs and revenue recovery, life-cycle costs shall be calculated using net present value analysis.

Upon application by a public utility for cost recovery, the commission shall determine an appropriate method of cost recovery that assures full cost recovery for the public utility. The air quality improvement costs recovered by the public utility shall not cause an average rate impact greater than the equivalent of one and one-half mills per kilowatt hour in any period, nor shall such costs exceed a total of two hundred eleven million dollars calculated using 1998 net present value dollars. The air quality improvement costs for a generating facility shall be recovered over a period of fifteen years or less.

Any revenues a public utility receives from transferring, selling, banking, or otherwise using allowances established under Title IV of the federal "Clean Air Act" or under any other trading program of regional or national applicability shall be credited to the public utility's customers to offset air quality improvement costs if such revenues are a result of a voluntary agreement entered into under part 12 of article 7 of title 25, C.R.S.

To the extent that a voluntary agreement entered into under part 12 of article 7 of title 25, C.R.S., does not increase the public utility's electric generating capacity, the voluntary agreement shall not be subject to any restrictions that arise from the commission's integrated resources planning rules.

The commission shall assure that any future industry restructuring does not adversely affect the ability of the public utility to recover its air quality improvement costs. Nothing in this section shall prevent the commission from considering the appropriate value, including market value, of a public utility's generation assets in any future industry restructuring proceeding.

If a public utility's wholesale sales are subject to regulation by the federal energy regulatory commission and the public utility sells power on the wholesale market from generating facilities that are subject to a voluntary agreement under part 12 of article 7 of title 25, C.R.S., the public utilities commission shall determine whether to assign a portion of the air quality improvement costs to be recovered from the public utility's wholesale customers. The public utilities commission may assign a portion of the air quality improvement costs to the public utility's wholesale customers to the extent that such portion of such cost recovery does not conflict with the public utility's wholesale contracts entered into prior to April 1, 1998.

If the public utilities commission assigns a portion of the public utility's air quality improvement costs to be recovered from the public utility's wholesale customers, the public utility may apply to the federal energy regulatory commission for recovery, effective on the date of filing, of the portion of costs assigned to the public utility's wholesale customers. The public utilities commission shall permit the public utility to recover the portion of costs assigned to the public utility's wholesale customers from its retail customers pending the federal energy regulatory commission's approval of recovery from the public utility's wholesale customers.

Notwithstanding paragraph (b) of this subsection (7), if the public utility fails to apply to the federal energy regulatory commission within six months after the public utilities commission's final order assigning a portion of the air quality improvement costs to the public utility's wholesale customers or fails to make a diligent, good faith effort to persuade the federal energy regulatory commission to approve the cost recovery from the public utility's wholesale customers, the public utility shall not be entitled to recover said portion of the costs from its retail customers.

All revenues that a public utility receives from its wholesale customers for air quality improvement costs shall be credited as an offset to the air quality improvement costs charged to the public utility's retail customers.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article added, p. 1050, § 3, effective July 1.

40-3.2-103. Gas distribution utility demand-side management programs - recovery of costs - reports.

Commencing in 2022 and no less frequently than every four years thereafter, each investor-owned gas distribution utility, also referred to in this section as a "gas utility", shall file an application to open a DSM strategic issues proceeding to develop energy savings targets to be achieved by the gas utility, taking into account its potential for cost-effective demand-side management as well as Colorado's greenhouse gas reduction goals. The commission shall, as part of approving a gas utility's gas DSM strategic issues application, also develop an estimated DSM budget commensurate with natural gas savings targets, funding and cost-recovery mechanisms, and a financial bonus structure for DSM programs implemented by a gas utility.

As part of the development of targets, mechanisms, and a bonus structure required by subsection (1) of this section, the commission shall:

Adopt an estimated budget for DSM program expenditures commensurate with the energy savings targets established by the commission;

Establish DSM program energy savings targets that are consistent with achieving the greenhouse gas reduction targets in section 25-7-102 (2)(g), take into consideration new clean energy technologies as contemplated by section 40-2-123, and reflect the maximum cost-effective and achievable natural gas savings potential for the gas utility consistent with the needs of its full-service customers;

Adopt procedures for allowing gas utilities to recover their prudently incurred costs of DSM programs without having to file a rate case. Such costs shall include, but are not limited to, facility investments; rebates; interest rate buy-downs; incremental labor costs, employee benefits, carrying costs, and employee-related administrative costs; and other administrative costs. All such costs shall be recovered through a cost adjustment mechanism that is set on an annual basis, or more frequently if deemed appropriate.
(c) (I) (A) Adopt procedures for allowing gas utilities to recover their prudently incurred costs of DSM programs without having to file a rate case. Such costs shall include, but are not limited to, facility investments; rebates; interest rate buy-downs; incremental labor costs, employee benefits, carrying costs, and employee-related administrative costs; and other administrative costs. All such costs shall be recovered through a cost adjustment mechanism that is set on an annual basis, or more frequently if deemed appropriate.

Labor costs shall reflect, and the commission shall require, compliance with all applicable labor standards set forth in section 40-3.2-105.5.

Cost adjustment procedures shall give gas utilities the option of obtaining cost recovery either through expensing DSM program expenditures or adding them to base rates, with an amortization period to be determined by the commission. In addition, such procedures shall provide that cost recovery for programs directed at residential customers are to be collected from residential customers only and that cost recovery for programs directed at nonresidential customers are to be collected from nonresidential customers only.

Adopt a bonus structure to reward gas utilities for investments in cost-effective DSM programs. For each year of operation, the bonus shall be capped at twenty-five percent of the expenditures or twenty percent of the net economic benefits of the DSM programs, whichever amount is lower. The amount of the bonus awarded each year shall be determined based on the extent to which the gas utility has achieved the targets established by the commission in accordance with paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection (2). The bonus shall not count against a gas utility's authorized rate of return or be considered in rate proceedings.

Consider the fact that implementing the new DSM programs may require a phase-in period before a gas utility is able to achieve the funding level determined by the commission pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (2). A gas utility that implements a new DSM program in phases shall be eligible to receive a bonus under the bonus structure adopted pursuant to paragraph (d) of this subsection (2) during its phase-in period.

Not adopt any measure authorizing a financial penalty against a gas utility that fails to meet the targets in any particular year.

(2.5) For gas utilities with fewer than two hundred fifty thousand full-service customers, the commission may establish energy savings targets, a budget for gas DSM program expenditures, funding and cost-recovery mechanisms, and a financial bonus structure in the same proceeding in which the utility's gas DSM program plan is submitted for approval.

After the development of the targets, mechanisms, and bonus structure as described in subsection (1) of this section, each gas utility shall:

Develop gas DSM program plans designed to meet or exceed the energy savings targets established by the commission.

Gas DSM program plans may be combined with electric DSM program plans, beneficial electrification plans, or other plans that reduce energy consumption or greenhouse gas emissions. Except as otherwise provided in subsections (3)(a)(III) and (3)(a)(IV) of this section, one or more of the gas DSM programs or measures, representing an aggregate total of at least twenty-five percent of overall residential gas DSM program expenditures, including expenditures serving income-qualified households, must be targeted to residential customers in income-qualified households.

In the case of a gas utility with fewer than fifty thousand full-service customers, and except as otherwise provided in subsection (3)(a)(IV) of this section, one or more of the gas DSM programs or measures, representing an aggregate total of at least fifteen percent of overall residential gas DSM program expenditures, including expenditures serving income-qualified households, must be targeted to residential customers in income-qualified households.

On or after January 1, 2026, the commission may commence proceedings to adjust the percentage specified in subsection (3)(a)(II) or (3)(a)(III) of this section in light of changed circumstances, so long as the resulting percentages represent a significant portion of gas DSM program expenditures and continue to make progress toward achievement of Colorado's energy efficiency and greenhouse gas emission reduction goals.

In implementing approved DSM programs, use reasonable efforts to maximize energy savings consistent with the annual energy efficiency budget.

(3.5) (a) To meet the energy savings targets established by the commission in accordance with this section, gas utilities shall consider including incentives for customers to utilize behind-the-meter thermal renewable sources. The commission shall not prohibit gas utilities from offering programs or incentives that encourage customers to replace gas-fueled appliances with efficient electric appliances.

The commission shall not require the removal of gas-fueled appliances or equipment from an existing structure nor ban the installation of gas service lines to any new structure.

In implementing DSM programs, gas utilities may spend a disproportionate share of total expenditures on one or more classes of customers.

The commission shall authorize each gas utility to recover money spent for education programs, impact and process evaluations, and program planning related to natural gas DSM programs offered by the gas utility without having to show that such expenditures, on an independent basis, are cost-effective. The commission may limit the amount spent for these activities.

Upon petition by a regulated gas utility, the commission shall remove disincentives to the implementation of effective gas DSM programs through the adoption of a rate adjustment mechanism that ensures that the revenue per customer approved by the commission in a general rate case proceeding is recovered by the gas utility without regard to the quantity of natural gas actually sold by the gas utility after the date the rate took effect. The commission shall separately calculate, for the rate class or classes to which a rate adjustment mechanism applies, the regulatory disincentives removed through that mechanism and collected or refunded by the gas utility through a tariff rider.

Removing disincentives through a rate adjustment mechanism adopted pursuant to subsection (5)(b)(I) of this section does not preclude a gas utility from receiving a bonus pursuant to subsection (2)(d) of this section.

The commission shall not reduce a gas utility's return on equity based solely on approval of a rate adjustment mechanism adopted pursuant to subsection (5)(b)(I) of this section.

Gas utilities shall submit annual reports to the commission, as determined by the commission by rule. The annual report shall describe the gas utility's DSM programs and shall document program expenditures, energy savings impacts and the techniques used to estimate these impacts, the estimated cost-effectiveness of program expenditures, and any other information the commission may require.

The commission shall review each report submitted pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (6) and shall determine the level of bonus, if any, that the gas utility is eligible to collect on the basis of the information included in the report. The commission's determination shall be made within three months after receiving the report. Any such bonus shall be authorized as a supplement to the cost adjustment mechanism or alternative mechanism approved by the commission and shall be applied over a twelve-month period after approval of the bonus.

Gas utilities may continue DSM programs that were in existence on or before May 22, 2007, and shall not be required to obtain approval from the commission for such programs.

This section shall not be construed to extend the commission's authority to any nonregulated utility businesses or affiliates of a gas utility.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 984, § 3, effective May 22.

L. 2021:

(1), IP(2), (2)(a), (2)(b), (2)(c)(I), (3), and (5) amended and (2.5) and (3.5) added, (HB 21-1238), ch. 330, p. 2133, § 4, effective September 7.

Cross references:

(1) For the definition of DSM programs, see § 40-1-102.

(2) For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1238, see section 1 of chapter 330, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

40-3.2-104. Electricity utility demand-side management programs - rules - annual report - definition.

It is the policy of the state of Colorado that a primary goal of electric utility least-cost resource planning is to minimize the net present value of revenue requirements. The commission may adopt rules as necessary to implement this policy.

The commission shall establish energy savings and peak demand reduction goals to be achieved by an investor-owned electric utility, taking into account the utility's cost-effective demand-side management potential, the need for electricity resources, the benefits of demand-side management investments, and other factors as determined by the commission.

The energy savings and peak demand reduction goals must be at least five percent of the utility's retail system peak demand, measured in megawatts, in the base year and at least five percent of the utility's retail energy sales, measured in megawatt-hours, in the base year. The base year is 2006. The goals shall be met in 2018, counting savings in 2018 from demand-side management measures installed starting in 2006. The commission may establish interim goals and may revise the goals as it deems appropriate.

Commencing January 1, 2019, the energy savings and peak demand reduction goals must be at least five percent of the utility's retail system peak demand, measured in megawatts, in the base year and at least five percent of the utility's retail energy sales, measured in megawatt-hours, in the base year. The base year is 2018. The goals shall be met in 2028, counting savings in 2028 from demand-side management measures installed starting in 2019. The commission may establish interim goals and may revise the goals as it deems appropriate.

The commission shall permit electric utilities to implement cost-effective electricity DSM programs to reduce the need for additional resources that would otherwise be met through a competitive acquisition process.

The commission shall ensure that utilities develop and implement DSM programs that give all classes of customers an opportunity to participate and shall give due consideration to the impact of DSM programs on nonparticipants and on low-income customers.

The commission shall allow an opportunity for a utility's investments in cost-effective DSM programs to be more profitable to the utility than any other utility investment that is not already subject to special incentives. In complying with this subsection (5), the commission shall consider, without limitation, the following incentive mechanisms, which shall take into consideration the performance of the DSM program:

An incentive to allow a rate of return on demand-side management investments that is higher than the utility's rate of return on other investments;

An incentive to allow the utility to accelerate the depreciation or amortization period for demand-side management investments;

An incentive to allow the utility to retain a portion of the net economic benefits associated with a DSM program for its shareholders;

An incentive to allow the utility to collect the costs of DSM programs through a cost adjustment clause;

Other incentive mechanisms that the commission deems appropriate.

Each investor-owned electric utility shall submit an annual report to the commission describing the DSM programs implemented by the electric utility in the previous year. The report shall document the following:

Program expenditures, including incentive payments;

Peak demand and energy savings impacts and the techniques used to estimate those impacts;

Avoided costs and the techniques used to estimate those costs;

The estimated cost-effectiveness of the DSM programs;

The net economic benefits of the DSM programs; and

Any other information required by the commission.

For purposes of this section, "electric utility" or "utility" means "investor-owned utility".

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 984, § 3, effective May 22; (7) added, p. 1172, § 3, effective May 23.

L. 2017:

(2) amended, (HB 17-1227), ch. 209, p. 813, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2020:

(5)(a) and (5)(b) amended, (HB 20-1402), ch. 216, p. 1059, § 72, effective June 30.

Cross references:

For the definition of DSM programs, see § 40-1-102.

40-3.2-105. Reporting requirement. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 984, § 3, effective May 22.

L. 2017:

Entire section repealed, (SB 17-044), ch. 4, p. 8, § 6, effective August 9.

40-3.2-105.5. Labor standards for gas DSM projects.

This section applies to all necessary plumbing, mechanical, and electrical work performed in connection with a project undertaken pursuant to a gas DSM program under this article 3.2 and for which a customer of an investor-owned utility applies for a rebate directly from the utility.

When practicable, the utility may assign its own employees to perform the work, subject to state licensing requirements and all applicable state and local rules, codes, and standards.

The utility shall make use of a list, referred to in this section as the "certified contractor list", containing the names and contact information of:

Qualified contractors that participate in apprenticeship programs that:

Are registered with the United States department of labor's employment and training administration or with a state apprenticeship council recognized by the United States department of labor; and

Have been providing training for at least six months; and

Qualified mechanical, electrical, and plumbing contractors that participate in apprenticeship programs meeting the standards specified in section 24-92-115 (1)(a)(II).

The Colorado department of labor and employment shall oversee the compilation of the certified contractor list through one of the following methods:

Directing the state apprenticeship council, if available, to assemble the information; or

Establish an application process whereby contractors would apply for inclusion in the list and provide evidence, in a form satisfactory to the department, that each applicant meets the criteria set forth in subsection (3)(a) of this section.

The utility shall publish the certified contractor list on its website and include or reference the list in all of the utility's relevant marketing material for gas DSM programs.

In addition to the certified contractor list, each investor-owned gas utility shall require its residential customers to use licensed plumbing and electrical contractors that perform the type of work appropriate to residential gas DSM installations for participation in gas DSM programs where a rebate is paid directly to the customer after the installation is complete and the customer uses a contractor.

The following requirements apply to gas DSM projects in new or existing buildings:

For plumbing, mechanical, or electrical projects undertaken by a commercial or industrial customer in a building that contains twenty thousand square feet or more of conditioned floor space and for which a rebate is to be provided directly to the customer as part of a gas DSM program, the utility shall condition payment of the rebate on the customer's exclusive use of contractors from the certified contractor list unless the work is done by employees of the utility.

For plumbing, mechanical, or electrical projects that involve energy efficiency improvements to central building systems in a multifamily building that contains twenty thousand square feet or more of conditioned floor space and for which a rebate is to be provided directly to the building owner as part of a gas DSM program, the utility shall condition payment of the rebate on the building owner's exclusive use of contractors that participate in apprenticeship programs registered with the United States department of labor's employment and training administration or with a state apprenticeship council recognized by the United States department of labor for any necessary plumbing or electrical work. If the contractor chosen by the customer is not on the certified contractor list, the utility shall require another method of verifying compliance with this subsection (4)(b).

This subsection (4)(b) does not apply to a gas DSM project that is limited to in-unit work in a multifamily building, as undertaken by the owner or tenant of the multifamily building or unit.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (HB 21-1238), ch. 330, p. 2135, § 5, effective September 7.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1238, see section 1 of chapter 330, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

40-3.2-105.6. Labor standards for beneficial electrification projects.

This section applies to all necessary mechanical, plumbing, and electrical work performed in connection with a project undertaken pursuant to a beneficial electrification program under this article 3.2 and for which a customer of an investor-owned electric utility applies for a rebate directly from the utility.

When practicable, the utility may assign its own employees to perform the work, subject to state licensing requirements and all applicable state and local rules, codes, and standards.

The utility shall obtain from the Colorado department of labor and employment and shall make use of a list, referred to in this section as the "certified contractor list", containing the names and contact information of:

Qualified contractors that participate in apprenticeship programs that are registered with the United States department of labor's employment and training administration or with a state apprenticeship council recognized by the United States department of labor; and

Qualified mechanical, electrical, and plumbing contractors that meet the graduation standards specified in section 24-92-115 (1)(a)(II).

The utility shall publish the certified contractor list on its website and include or reference the list in all of the utility's relevant marketing material for beneficial electrification programs.

As a condition for customer participation in beneficial electrification programs where a rebate is paid directly to the customer after installation is complete, each investor-owned electric utility shall require its residential customers to verify that they used licensed electricians and plumbers or properly supervised apprentices on all plumbing and electrical work performed by a contractor on residential installations that qualify for a beneficial electrification rebate.

The following requirements apply to beneficial electrification projects in new or existing industrial, commercial, or multifamily residential buildings:

For plumbing, mechanical, or electrical projects undertaken by a commercial or industrial customer in a building that contains twenty thousand square feet or more of conditioned floor space and for which a rebate is to be provided directly to the customer as part of a beneficial electrification program, the utility shall condition payment of the rebate on the customer's exclusive use of contractors from the certified contractor list unless the work is done by employees of the utility.

For plumbing, mechanical, or electrical projects that involve the beneficial electrification of central building systems in a multifamily building that contains twenty thousand square feet or more of conditioned floor space and for which a rebate is to be provided directly to the building owner as part of a beneficial electrification program, the utility shall condition payment of the rebate on the building owner's exclusive use of contractors that participate in apprenticeship programs registered with the United States department of labor's employment and training administration or with a state apprenticeship council recognized by the United States department of labor for any necessary plumbing or electrical work. If the contractor chosen by the building owner is not on the certified contractor list, the utility shall require another method of verifying compliance with this subsection (4)(b).

This subsection (4)(b) does not apply to a beneficial electrification project that is limited to in-unit work in a multifamily building, as undertaken by the owner or tenant of the multifamily building or unit.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-246), ch. 283, p. 1677, § 5, effective September 7.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 21-246, see section 1 of chapter 283, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

40-3.2-106. Costs of pollution in utility planning - rules.

The commission shall require an electric or gas public utility subject to commission jurisdiction to consider the social cost of carbon dioxide emissions and the social cost of methane emissions, as set forth in subsections (4) and (5) of this section, when determining the cost, benefit, or net present value of any plan or proposal submitted in one of the following proceedings:

Electric resource plans or any utility plan or application that considers or proposes the acquisition of new electric generating resources or the retirement of existing utility generation;

Applications related to section 40-2-124;

Applications related to, or the commission's evaluation of, programs adopted under section 40-3.2-103;

Applications related to, or the commission's evaluation of, programs adopted under section 40-3.2-104; or

A plan or application for transportation electrification under section 40-5-107 or any other form of beneficial electrification, including beneficial electrification in buildings.

In a proceeding listed in subsection (1)(a) of this section, a utility shall:

At a minimum, model an optimization of a base case portfolio of resources using the cost of carbon dioxide emissions, as set forth pursuant to subsection (4) of this section. The cost of carbon dioxide emissions must apply to the evaluation of all existing electric generation resources and to any new resources evaluated or proposed as part of the resource modeling. The commission may require a utility to file or propose additional base cases. The utility may propose, and the commission shall consider, alternative optimized portfolios of resources in addition to the base case, utilizing different levels of costs for carbon dioxide.

Present a calculation of the net present value of revenue requirement for the resources in each optimized portfolio. To show the net present value of revenue requirement that would be incurred by the utility for implementing the portfolio, in addition to presenting the full net present value of revenue requirement through a calculation using the cost of carbon dioxide emissions set forth pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, the utility shall also present the full net present value of revenue requirement through a calculation without using the cost of carbon dioxide emissions set forth pursuant to subsection (4) of this section.

In addition to the net present value of revenue requirement calculations required in subsection (2)(b)(I) of this section, for each optimized model run, the utility must provide a present value calculation showing the net present value of the total cost of carbon dioxide emissions of each portfolio, calculated by multiplying the total emissions of that portfolio by the cost of carbon dioxide set forth pursuant to subsection (4) of this section.

In approving a resource plan, either with generic resources or in the analysis of bids in a competitive solicitation, the commission shall require a comparison of the portfolios' net present value of revenue requirements inclusive of the social cost of carbon dioxide. The commission shall also consider:

The net present value of revenue requirements of the cost of carbon dioxide or carbon dioxide equivalent emissions;

The net present value of revenue requirements that would be incurred by the utility for implementing the portfolio; and

Other relevant factors, as determined by the commission.

The commission shall base the cost of carbon dioxide emissions on the most recent assessment of the social cost of carbon dioxide developed by the federal government using a discount rate of two and one-half percent or less. Starting in 2020, the commission shall use a social cost of carbon dioxide of not less than sixty-eight dollars per short ton. The commission shall modify the cost of carbon dioxide emissions based on escalation rates of the 2020 base cost by an amount that is equal to or greater than the escalation rates established in the technical support document. When calculating the cost of carbon dioxide emissions for any proceeding listed in subsection (1) of this section, the commission shall use a discount rate for the social cost of carbon dioxide that does not exceed the lesser of two and one-half percent or any lower value established by the most recent available successor to the technical support document. Notwithstanding the discount rate used to develop the social cost of carbon dioxide value over the planning period, the commission shall continue to discount any net present value analysis of any optimized resource portfolio in the electric resource planning process using discount rates that the commission deems appropriate.

In the base case analysis of cost effectiveness as described in section 40-1-102 (5)(b), the commission shall apply the social cost of carbon dioxide and the social cost of methane emissions to the benefit-cost calculation for programs that are defined to be energy efficiency or beneficial electrification programs or that incorporate behind-the-meter thermal renewable sources.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-236), ch. 359, p. 3309, § 13, effective May 30.

L. 2021:

IP(3) and (3)(a) amended, (SB 21-272), ch. 220, p. 1161, § 8, effective June 10; IP(1), (1)(c), (4), and (5) amended and (1)(c.5) added, (HB 21-1238), ch. 330, p. 2137, § 6, effective September 7; IP(1), (1)(d), and (5) amended and (6) repealed, (SB 21-246), ch. 283, p. 1676, § 4, effective September 7.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsections IP(1) and (5) by HB 21-1238 and SB 21-246 were harmonized.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1238, see section 1 of chapter 330, Session Laws of Colorado 2021. For the legislative declaration in SB 21-246, see section 1 of chapter 283, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

40-3.2-107. Costs of methane pollution in gas DSM program planning - rules - definitions.

The commission shall require a gas public utility subject to commission jurisdiction to consider the social cost of methane emissions, as set forth in subsection (2) of this section, when determining the cost, benefit, or net present value of revenue requirements of any plan or proposal submitted in an application related to, or the commission's evaluation of, programs adopted under section 40-3.2-103.

The commission shall base the social cost of methane emissions on the most recent assessment of the global social cost of methane developed by the federal government, using a discount rate of two and one-half percent or less as updated to reflect the latest available figures derived from peer-reviewed, published studies; except that, beginning on September 7, 2021, the commission shall use a social cost of methane of not less than one thousand seven hundred fifty-six dollars per short ton. The commission shall modify the social cost of methane emissions based on escalation rates of the 2020 base cost by an amount that is equal to or greater than the escalation rates established in the addendum to the technical support document and shall use a discount rate that does not exceed the lesser of two and one-half percent or any lower value established by the most recent available successor to the technical support document.

When calculating the cost of methane emissions for any purpose listed in subsection (1) of this section, the commission shall obtain and apply the best available values for natural gas leakage during the extraction, processing, transportation, and delivery of natural gas by the gas public utility as well as leakage from piping or other equipment on customer premises. The commission shall take into account any relevant data and emissions accounting methodologies developed by the air quality control commission pursuant to section 25-7-140 regarding methane leakage rates and the appropriate global warming potential of methane. The commission shall use the same discount rate as that used to develop the federal social cost of methane, as set forth in the addendum to the technical support document.

Notwithstanding the discount rate used for the cost of methane emissions, the commission shall discount other future cost streams into the net present value analysis of any resource portfolio in the gas DSM program planning process using a discount rate that the commission deems relevant to the parties responsible for financing or paying these future costs. When ratepayers are covering costs without investment from gas public utilities, such as environmental costs or pass-through fuel costs, the commission shall give consideration to discounting those costs with a stable long-term inflation rate that, in the commission's judgment, accurately represents the net present value of future cash flows experienced by ratepayers.

As used in this section:

"Addendum to the technical support document" means the 2016 addendum of the federal interagency working group on social cost of greenhouse gases, entitled "Addendum to Technical Support Document on Social Cost of Carbon for Regulatory Impact Analysis under Executive Order 12866: Application of the Methodology to Estimate the Social Cost of Methane and the Social Cost of Nitrous Oxide".

"Technical support document" means the 2016 technical support document of the federal interagency working group on social cost of greenhouse gases, entitled "Technical Update of the Social Cost of Carbon for Regulatory Impact Analysis Under Executive Order 12866".

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (HB 21-1238), ch. 330, p. 2138, § 7, effective September 7.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1238, see section 1 of chapter 330, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.